Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.210

Funds for commission in counties with populations of two hundred ten thousand or more—County budget—Surplus.

The county legislative authority or [of] each county with a population of two hundred ten thousand or more may provide in the county budget for each fiscal year a sum equal to one percent of the preceding year's total payroll of those included under the jurisdiction and scope of this chapter. The funds so provided shall be used for the support of the commission. Any part of the funds so provided and not expended for the support of the commission during the fiscal year shall be placed in the general fund of the county, or counties according to the ratio of contribution, on the first day of January following the close of such fiscal year.

[ 1991 c 363 s 117; 1971 ex.s. c 214 s 3; 1959 c 1 s 21 (Initiative Measure No. 23, approved November 4, 1958).]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.